Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1062
State 911 director.

The commission shall appoint a state 911 director to manage the department established within the commission for the 911 service system. The commission shall ensure that the department has all necessary staffing and resources. The commission may retain contracted experts or consultants who may be required for the administration of the 911 Service System Act.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1026;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 44.